Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 23
NOXIOUS WEEDS ON LANDS WITHIN IRRIGATION PROJECTS

Sec.

§ 42-2301. Eradication of weeds by companies.

Any company, association of persons, or corporation, engaged in the operation, control or management of any irrigation project or canal system for the purpose of furnishing water to its shareholders, not for profit or hire, shall have the right, when its articles of incorporation shall so provide, to include as a part of the service of maintenance and operation of the project or canal system the treatment and eradication of noxious weeds growing on the lands within the boundaries of said project or system, and adjacent thereto.

§ 42-2302. Funds for charges and expenses.

To provide funds to meet necessary charges and expenses for the treatment and eradication of noxious weeds as provided in section 42-2301[, Idaho Code], the board of directors of such company, association of persons, or corporation, may utilize monies available under the provisions of section 42-2201[, Idaho Code], and may also levy and collect, pursuant to title 42, chapter 22[, Idaho Code], money for necessary charges and expenses against any given piece of land according to the benefits which shall accrue to the same, to be determined by the board of directors of such company, association of persons, or corporation.

§ 42-2303. Cooperation with established weed program.

The work to be carried on under the provisions of this act shall be in cooperation with the weed program of the constituted authorities of the state, pursuant to chapter 235 of the 1939 Session Laws, and Acts amendatory thereof, but shall not interfere with or usurp any of the powers which are now granted by the provisions of said act, or acts amendatory thereof.

§ 42-2304. Provisions of act permissive.

The provisions of this act shall not be construed as mandatory, but permissive only as to any company, association of persons, or corporation, referred to in section 42-2301[, Idaho Code].